Washington statutes.
RCW 7.25.010

Validity of bond issues may be tested.

Whenever the legislative or governing body of the state or any county, city, school district, other municipal corporation, taxing district, or any agency, instrumentality, or public corporation thereof shall desire to issue bonds of any kind and shall have passed an ordinance or resolution authorizing the same, the validity of such proposed bond issue may be tested and determined in the manner provided in this chapter.

[ 1999 c 284 s 1; 1983 c 263 s 1; 1939 c 153 s 1; RRS s 5616-11. Formerly RCW 7.24.150.]